Utah statutes.
53A-17a-106.   Determination of weighted pupil units.

The number of weighted pupil units in the minimum school program for each year is the total of the units for each school district determined as follows:

(1)  The number of units is computed by adding the average daily membership of all pupils of the district attending schools, other than kindergarten and self-contained classes for children with a disability.

(2)  The number of units is computed by adding the average daily membership of all pupils of the district enrolled in kindergarten and multiplying the total by .55.

(a)  In those districts that do not elect to hold kindergarten for a full nine-month term, the local school board may approve a shorter term of nine weeks' duration.

(b)  Upon board approval, the number of pupils in average daily membership at the short-term kindergarten shall be counted for the purpose of determining the number of units allowed in the same ratio as the number of days the short-term kindergarten is held, not exceeding nine weeks, compared to the total number of days schools are held in that district in the regular school year.

(3) (a)  The State Board of Education shall use prior year plus growth to determine average daily membership in distributing money under the minimum school program where the distribution is based on kindergarten through grade 12 ADMs or weighted pupil units.

(b)  Under prior year plus growth, kindergarten through grade 12 average daily membership for the current year is based on the actual kindergarten through grade 12 average daily membership for the previous year plus an estimated percentage growth factor.

(c)  The growth factor is the percentage increase in total average daily membership on the first school day of October in the current year as compared to the total average daily membership on the first school day of October of the previous year.



Amended by Chapter 73, 2001 General Session

